Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB896.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 704(b)(1) of the act of November 24, 1998 (P.L.882, No.111), known as the Crime Victims Act, is amended to read:Section 704. Determination of claims.* * *(b) Review.--(1) The Office of Victims' Services shall review the claim and all supporting documents and investigate the validity of the claim. The investigation [shall] may include an examination of police, court and official records and reports provided by the claimant concerning the crime and may 123456789101112131415161718192021 include an examination of medical and hospital reports relating to the injury upon which the claim is based. Providing the Office of Victims' Services with a valid form of supporting documentation described under section 707(a.1) shall be considered sufficient to verify that the crime occurred. Nothing in this paragraph shall be construed to limit the Office of Victims' Services' ability to contact the agency, organization, court or individual from which a supporting document is said to originate to confirm the document's authenticity. The Office of Victims' Services may not request or review counseling notes of mental health service providers. The Office of Victims' Services shall request an assessment from the mental health service provider as to the extent the service provided is needed as a direct result of the crime.* * *Section 2. Section 707(a), (a.1), (a.2) and (b)(1)(iii) of the act are amended and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 707. Awards.(a) Requirements.--No award shall be made unless it is determined by a preponderance of the evidence that:(1) A crime was committed.(2) The person injured or killed was a direct victim or intervenor.(3) The crime was promptly reported to the proper authorities or the Office of Victims' Services receives a form of documentation described under subsection (a.1).(4) The direct victim, intervenor or claimant has fully cooperated with [all law enforcement agencies and] the Office 20250SB0896PN1026 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 of Victims' Services, unless the Office of Victims' Services finds the noncompliance to have been justified consistent with the Office of Victims' Services regulations. The Office of Victims' Services shall [ensure that the regulations relating to cooperation with all law enforcement agencies of a direct victim, intervenor or claimant comply with] provide information encouraging victim cooperation with law enforcement agencies in compliance with all applicable Federal laws and regulations relating to state promotion of victim cooperation with law enforcement.(a.1) [Protection from abuse] Supporting documentation.--A claimant who satisfies the eligibility requirements of subsection (a)(1), (2) and (4) may satisfy the eligibility requirement under subsection (a)(3) [for reporting a crime to the proper authorities by commencing] by doing any of the following:(1) Commencing an action brought in accordance with 23 Pa.C.S. Ch. 61 (relating to protection from abuse) and as provided for in the Pennsylvania Rules of Civil Procedure. In no case may an award be made if the record shows that the petition was[:(1) Withdrawn] withdrawn, unless the Office of Victims' Services finds the withdrawal to have been justified, consistent with regulations of the Office of Victims' Services.(2) (Reserved).(2.1) Commencing an action brought in accordance with 42 Pa.C.S. Ch. 62A (relating to protection of victims of sexual violence or intimidation) and as provided under the Pennsylvania Rules of Civil Procedure. An award may not be 20250SB0896PN1026 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 made if the record shows that the petition was withdrawn, except if the Office of Victims' Services finds the withdrawal to have been justified, consistent with regulations of the Office of Victims' Services.(3) Providing the Office of Victims' Services with medical records documenting injuries to the direct victim or intervenor, consistent with the allegations of the crime.(4) Obtaining a sexual assault forensic examination.(5) Providing the Office of Victims' Services with a signed statement from a mental health care provider or other licensed health care provider certifying that the victim suffered from physical or mental injury as a result of the crime. In the event the certifying mental health care provider or licensed health care provider provides direct services to the victim, compensation for the services shall be limited to Medicare-approved rates.(6) Any other form of documentation that the Office of Victims' Services considers sufficient pursuant to regulations to verify that the crime occurred.[(a.2) Sexual violence and intimidation orders.--A claimant who satisfies the eligibility requirements of subsection (a)(1), (2) and (4) may satisfy the eligibility requirement under subsection (a)(3) for reporting a crime to the proper authorities by commencing an action brought in accordance with 42 Pa.C.S. Ch. 62A (relating to protection of victims of sexual violence or intimidation) and as provided for in the Pennsylvania Rules of Civil Procedure. An award may not be made if the record shows that the petition was withdrawn, except if the Office of Victims' Services finds the withdrawal to have been justified, consistent with regulations of the Office of 20250SB0896PN1026 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Victims' Services.](b) Amount.--(1) Any award made under this chapter shall be contingent upon funds being available and be in an amount not exceeding out-of-pocket loss, together with loss of past, present or future earnings or support resulting from such injury. In no case shall the total amount of an award exceed $35,000 except for payment of the following:* * *(iii) reasonable and necessary costs of cleaning the crime scene of a private residence or privately owned motor vehicle, the amount of which shall not exceed [$500] $1,500.* * *(i) Debt collection activities prohibited.--(1) When a claimant files a claim for compensation under this chapter, any of the following that has been given notice of a pending claim relating to the debt or expense, as provided under paragraph (3) or (4), shall refrain from all debt collection activities relating to the claim until the Office of Victims' Services has made an award on the claim and issued payment or 45 days after the date of notice from the Office of Victims' Services of a final decision to deny the claim:(i) A hospital or licensed health care provider that has provided medical care in relation to the crime upon which the claim is based.(ii) A person or entity that has provided funeral or death-related services in relation to the death of a victim.20250SB0896PN1026 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (iii) A person or entity that has provided crime scene cleanup services.(iv) Another vendor of a service or expense that may be eligible for an award under this chapter.(2) As soon as practicable, the Office of Victims' Services shall issue to a claimant a written notice of the claim and inform the claimant that the claimant may provide a copy of the written notice to vendors or service providers to have debt collection activities cease while the claim is pending.(3) An applicant may provide a copy of the written notice issued under paragraph (2) to a vendor or service provider waiting for payment of a debt related to the claim. Providing the notice to a vendor or service provider authorizes the vendor, service provider or a billing agent of the vendor or service provider to confirm with the Office of Victims' Services the claimant's claim status and date of resolution as it relates to vendor or service provider's specific debt.(4) A vendor or service provider that assists an applicant in completing or submitting a claim for compensation, or a vendor or service provider that submits a bill to the Office of Victims' Services, has constructive notice of the filing of the claim and must not engage in debt collection activities against the applicant for debt related to the claim, in accordance with paragraph (1).(5) The statute of limitations for collection of debt shall be tolled during the period in which the applicable vendor or service provider is required to refrain from debt collection activities under this subsection.20250SB0896PN1026 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (6) As used in this subsection, the term "debt collection activities":(i) Shall include:(A) repeatedly calling or writing to a claimant or other person eligible for benefits associated with a claim;(B) threatening to refer or actually referring the unpaid health care matter, funeral expense, other death-related expense or crime scene cleanup expense to a debt collection agency or an attorney for collection;(C) filing a legal action or pursuing any legal process or legal proceeding; or(D) contacting a credit ratings agency or distributing information that could affect the claimant's credit rating as a result of nonpayment for the service provided.(ii) Shall not include:(A) billing insurance or other government programs;(B) routine inquiries about coverage by private insurance or government programs; or(C) routine billing that indicates that the amount is not due pending resolution of the claim for compensation.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0896PN1026 - 7 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526